District of Columbia statutes.
42-511

Future estates — Remainder and conditional limitation.

If it is to commence upon the full expiration of such precedent estate, it is a remainder and may be transferred by that name. If it is to commence on a contingency which, if it happen, will abridge or determine such precedent estate before its expiration, it shall be known as a conditional limitation.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1021
Proceeding by remainderman to determine whether or not life tenant is still alive, see § 16-1151 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 45-211.
1973 Ed., § 45-811.